Utah statutes.
54-3-2.   Schedules of rates and classification -- Right of inspection --
Changes by commission.
(1)  Under the rules and regulations made by the commission, every public
utility, shall file with the commission within the time and in the form as the
commission may designate, and shall print and keep open to public inspection,
schedules showing all rates, tolls, rentals, charges, and classifications
collected or enforced, or to be collected or enforced, together with all
rules, regulations, contracts, privileges, and facilities which in any manner
affect or relate to rates, tolls, rentals, charges, classifications, or
service.
(2)  Except for motor carriers exempted under federal law, nothing in this
section shall prevent the commission from approving or fixing rates, tolls,
rentals, or charges from time to time greater, or less, than those shown by
the schedules.
(3)  The commission shall have power, in its discretion, to determine and
prescribe, by order, changes in the form of the schedules referred to in this
section as it may find expedient, and to modify the requirements of any of its
orders or rules or regulations in respect to any matters described in this
section.
